Connecticut, session 2026, SB00468.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Subsection (d) of section 4-70b of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1,
2026):
(d) The secretary shall establish uniform policies and procedures for
obtaining, managing and evaluating the quality and cost effectiveness
of direct health and human services purchased from a private provider
organization or municipality. To the extent permissible under federal
law, such policies and procedures shall include, but not be limited to, a
requirement that a private provider organization receive payment for
any services provided pursuant to a purchase of service contract not
later than forty-five days after the receipt of a properly completed claim
or the receipt of such services, whichever is later, in accordance with
section 4a-71. The secretary shall require all state agencies which
purchase direct health and human services to comply with such policies
and procedures.
Governor's Action:
Approved June 4, 2026